Arkansas, session 2025, HB1551.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 5, Chapter 61, Subchapter 1, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
5-61-103. Coerced criminal abortion by means of fraud.
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Abortion" means a chemical abortion as defined in § 20-16-
2502; and
(2)(A) "Abortion-inducing drug" means a medicine, drug,
combination of drugs or chemicals, or any other substance used with the
intent of causing an abortion including without limitation off-label use of
drugs known to have abortion-inducing properties, such as mifepristone, RU-
486, Mifeprex, Cytotec, misoprostol, and methotrexate.
(B) "Abortion-inducing drug" does not include:
(i) Drugs that may be known to increase the risk of
miscarriage, but which are prescribed for other medical indications such as
chemotherapeutic agents or diagnostic drugs; and
*CEB022*
03-18-2025 14:05:48 CEB022

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 S3/18/25 HB1551
(ii) Contraceptives, emergency contraceptives, or
methotrexate when used to treat an ectopic pregnancy.
(b) A person commits coerced criminal abortion by means of fraud if he
or she knowingly administers or gives an abortion-inducing drug to a pregnant
woman without her knowledge or consent with the purpose to cause an abortion.
(c) A person who violates subsection (b) of this section upon
conviction is guilty of a Class B felony.
(d) A prosecution under this section does not prevent prosecution
under another section if a person commits coerced criminal abortion by means
of fraud and the use of an abortion-inducing drug causes the death or bodily
injury of the pregnant woman or an unborn child.

/s/Gazaway























03-18-2025 14:05:48 CEB022